Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-404.04
Commissioner of Education; federal funds; disbursement.

The Commissioner of Education shall be entitled to receive any funds made available by the United States Government for the purpose of carrying out the program of approving and certifying educational and training institutions, and related training in connection therewith. Such funds shall be turned over to the State Treasurer, and disbursed upon vouchers approved by the commissioner, and warrants issued as provided by law.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 21, p. 935.